Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 16 Purchase of Explosive Materials

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

35 C.J.S. Explosives § 1 et seq.

§ 35-16-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

35-16-101

,

35-16-102

] unless the context otherwise requires:

“Explosive materials” means explosives, blasting agents, and detonators as defined by section 181.11 of title 26, Code of Federal Regulations [27 CFR § 55.11];

“Nonlicensee or nonpermittee” means any individual, corporation, company, association, firm, partnership, society, or joint stock company who is not required to be licensed or obtain a permit under title XI, Regulation of Explosives, of the federal Organized Crime Control Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-452) [18 U.S.C. §§ 841 to 848].

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 166, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-526.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Code of Federal Regulations. —

26 CFR § 181.11 has been renumbered as 27 CFR § 55.11.

§ 35-16-102.
Purchase of explosive materials from contiguous state permitted; transportation, shipment or receipt.

Any nonlicensee or nonpermittee who is a resident of the state of Wyoming and who uses explosive materials in the conduct of business may lawfully purchase explosive materials from a licensee of a state contiguous to the state of Wyoming and may transport, ship, or receive any such explosive materials if all requirements of section 181.26 of title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations [27 CFR § 555.26] are met.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 166, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-527.

Code of Federal Regulations. —

26 CFR § 181.26 has been renumbered as 27 CFR § 555.26.